Tennessee, session 114, SB2430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-407(c), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
A posted sign or notice must clearly define the area in which driving, parking, standing,
or otherwise operating a motor vehicle is prohibited.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2430
012186
- 1 -